Rhode Island, session 2025, SB271.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18.9 of the General Laws entitled "Benefit Determination and
Utilization Review Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18.9-16. Utilization review decisions for the treatment of alcohol or substance use
disorder.
(a) For health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section,
an insurer shall not require or conduct a prospective or concurrent review for a prescription
medicine:
(1) That is used in the treatment of alcohol or opioid use disorder and contains Methadone,
Buprenorphine or Naltrexone; or
(2) That is used in the treatment of alcohol or opioid use disorder and was approved before
the effective date of this section by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the
mitigation of opioid withdrawal symptoms.
SECTION 2. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Utilization reviews for Medicaid benefits.
In conducting utilization reviews for Medicaid benefits, each Medicaid managed care
organization shall use the medical necessity criteria selected by the executive office of health and
human services for making determinations of medical necessity and clinical appropriateness

pursuant to the utilization review plan.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001161/SUB A
========
LC001161/SUB A - Page 2 of 3